New York, session 2025-2026, S3664.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 24-340 to read as follows: 3 § 24-340 Senior citizen water rate freeze. a. For purposes of this 4 section the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (1) "Qualified homeowner" means a person who: (a) is at least sixty- 6 five years of age; (b) owns real property; and (c) has had a total 7 household income of less than fifty thousand dollars for two consecutive 8 income tax years beginning in two thousand nineteen, as verified by the 9 New York city department of finance; 10 (2) "Real property" means a one, two, three, or four family home owned 11 by a qualified homeowner that serves as the primary residence of such 12 homeowner; 13 (3) "Water rate increase" means an increase in water rates that takes 14 effect subsequent to a qualified homeowner's eligibility under this 15 section. 16 b. Real property owned by a qualified homeowner shall be exempt from 17 any charges due to a water rate increase. 18 c. The exemption provided by this section may be suspended for no more 19 than one calendar year by the commissioner of the department of environ- 20 mental protection of the city of New York (1) in the event of a drought, 21 or (2) in the event of a disaster or catastrophe other than drought, 22 which causes or may cause an actual and immediate shortage of available 23 and usable water. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08258-01-5 S. 3664 2 1 d. Eligibility for the exemption provided by this section shall not 2 preclude a qualified homeowner's eligibility for any other exemption or 3 credit to which they are entitled. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2027.